New Jersey, session 221, A4038.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. Notwithstanding any provision of Title 19 of the Revised Statutes, or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the blank forms of petitions to be used by candidates to be voted for at the general election by the voters of a single municipality shall be made available only from the municipal clerks of the respective municipalities wherein the officer or officers nominated are to be voted for. 2. Notwithstanding any provision of Title 19 of the Revised Statutes, or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the blank forms of petitions to be used by candidates to be voted for at the primary election by the voters of a political party of a single municipality shall be made available only from the municipal clerks of the respective municipalities wherein the officer or officers nominated are to be voted for. 3. This act shall take effect immediately.